New Jersey, session 221, A2833.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In any municipality that requires by ordinance a person applying for representation by a municipal public defender to pay an application fee pursuant to section 17 of P.L.1997, c.256 (C.2B:24-17), the municipal court shall be required to provide notice to all applicants of the application fee and the process to waive the fee in the event the applicant is unable to pay.  No fee other than that permitted by section 17 of P.L. 1997, c.256 (C.2B:24-17) shall be assessed for representation by a municipal public defender. 2.    This act shall take effect 60 days after enactment.